Nebraska, session 109, LB605.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB605 LB605
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Biological sex means the biological sex of an individual as the
male or female gender assigned at birth;
(b) Gender means the state of being male or female;
(c) Gender eligibility means a student's gender for purposes of
eligibility for activities sponsored by a school or by an athletic or
activities association to which a school is a member, which shall be
determined by the biological sex noted on the student's birth
certificate;
(d) Gender expression means external appearance, characteristics, or
behaviors typically associated with a specific gender;
(e) Gender identity means an innate sense of an individual's own
gender; and
(f) Transgender means having a gender identity or gender expression
that differs from societal expectations based on gender assigned at
birth.
(2) Each school board shall develop and adopt a policy relating to
student participation in extracurricular activities as a transgender
student. Such policy shall:
(a) Require a student's medical information, which may include
information regarding a student's transgender status, legal name, or
gender assignment at birth, be kept confidential by the school in
accordance with applicable local, state, and federal privacy laws unless
required to be shared by law or policy or otherwise authorized by a
student and such student's family;
(b) Require the following procedures in regard to allowing
participation by a transgender student in extracurricular activities
sponsored by a school or an athletics or activities association to which
the school is a member:
(i) That a transgender student and such student's parent contact a
school administrator or athletic director, in writing, indicating that
-2-

LB605 LB605
2025 2025
the student is a transgender student, having a consistent gender identity
different than the biological sex on the student's birth certificate, and
list the activities in which the student wishes to participate. Such
writing shall be provided to the school board by the school administrator
or athletic director;
(ii) That the school board determine if the student meets the
eligibility standards for participation as a transgender student pursuant
to the policy developed and adopted pursuant to this section and if the
student is likely to meet the requirements of participation of any
applicable athletics or activities association to which the school is a
member; and
(iii) That, if the school board determines that the student meets
the eligibility requirements of the school for participation as a
transgender student in an extracurricular activity sponsored by the
school or an athletics or activities association to which the school is a
member, the school board submit such eligibility application to any
necessary and applicable athletics or activities association required for
participation by such transgender student;
(c) Require the following information be provided to the school
board and authorize such information to be shared with any applicable
athletics or activities association to which the school is a member if
required by such association for a request by a student to participate in
an extracurricular activity as a transgender student:
(i) The current school registration information of the student;
(ii) A written statement from the student and the student's parent
or guardian affirming the consistent gender identity and expression to
which the student self-relates;
(iii) Documentation from individuals including, but not limited to,
parents, friends, and teachers affirming the actions, attitudes, dress,
and manner of the student that demonstrate the student's consistent
gender identification and expression;
-3-

LB605 LB605
2025 2025
(iv) Written verification from an appropriate health care
professional of the student's consistent gender identification and
expression;
(v) Medical documentation of any hormonal therapy, sexual
reassignment surgery, physiological testing, counseling, or medical or
psychological interventions on behalf of the student; and
(vi) Any other relevant documentation and information provided by
the student or the student's parent or guardian;
(d) Require the following review criteria be used as part of a
determination by the school board as to the approval or denial by the
school board of a student application to participate in an
extracurricular activity as a transgender student:
(i) That the documentation required pursuant to subdivision (2)(c)
has been submitted to the school board; and
(ii) For a student applying to participate in an extracurricular
athletic activity as a transgender female, that creditable medical
documentation of hormonal therapy, sexual reassignment surgery, or
physiological testing has been submitted to the school board and
establishes that the transgender female student has either completed a
minimum of one year of hormone treatment related to gender transition or
undergone medically confirmed gender reassignment surgery and
demonstrates to the school board through a medical examination and
physiological testing that the transgender female student-athlete does
not possess physical or physiological advantages over biological females
of the same age group;
(e) Require that any hormone supplementation or suppression therapy
by a student applying for participation in an extracurricular activity as
a transgender student (i) is taken under the supervision of, and
monitored by, a licensed physician and (ii) does not violate any
performance-enhancing supplement policy of the school board or any
athletics or activities association to which the school is a member;
-4-

LB605 LB605
2025 2025
(f) Require that upon approval by the school board and any
applicable athletics or activities association to which the school is a
member, the student may not return to such student's gender identified on
the birth certificate for purposes of participation in an extracurricular
activity sponsored by the school or an athletic or activities association
to which the school is a member unless another evaluation is undertaken
by the school board and applicable association, except that a transgender
female student that has been approved for participation on a female team
pursuant to such policy may participate on a male team when there is no
female team available or offered by the school in such sport or a
comparable sport. A transgender male student who has been approved for
participation on a male team pursuant to this policy shall not be
eligible for participation on a female team unless reevaluated and
approved pursuant to the policy developed pursuant to this section;
(g) Require that if a student evaluated pursuant to the school
board's policy is denied participation as a transgender student, the
student's eligibility for extracurricular activities sponsored by the
school or an athletics or activities association to which the school is a
member remains with the team of the gender identified on the student's
birth certificate;
(h) Require an appeals process be developed by the school board for
a student evaluated pursuant to the school board's policy and require
that the school board comply with the requirements of any appeals process
not inconsistent with this policy that is adopted by an applicable
athletics or activities association to which the school is a member;
(i) Require that a student approved to participate in an
extracurricular activity as a transgender student pursuant to the policy
developed and adopted pursuant to this section, use the restroom, shower,
and locker room associated with the student's biological sex when
necessary and appropriate or be assigned a separate restroom, shower, or
locker room for use when appropriate and available; and
-5-

LB605 LB605
2025 2025
(j) Require that if a school board approves an application for a
student to participate in an extracurricular activity as a transgender
student in an activity that also requires such transgender student
eligibility be approved by an athletics or activities association to
which such school is a member, the school board shall cooperate with, and
submit, any documentation required by the association in order for such
student to receive a determination from such association relating to the
transgender student's participation eligibility.
(3) A school board shall require eligibility for an extracurricular
activity separated by male and female teams to be based on the student's
gender as determined by the biological sex noted on the student's birth
certificate unless approved for participation as a transgender student
pursuant to the policy developed and adopted under subsection (2) of this
section or by a policy relating to cross-gender participation in sports.
(4) Nothing in the policy developed and adopted pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section shall be construed to encourage any
student to undergo hormone therapy, sex reassignment surgery, or other
medical treatment resulting in a change to the student's gender.
(5) Nothing in the policy developed and adopted pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section shall be construed to affect a policy
relating to cross-gender participation in sports which authorizes a
female to participate on a male team when there is no female team offered
or available by the school in that sport or a comparable sport.
-6-